Nevada, session 83, AB164.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 394.557 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.557 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each postsecondary educational institution licensed in this state shall
pay to the Administrator a fee of $5 for each student the institution
initially enrolls in a program for which the student pays a tuition
or registration fee. On or before January 1, April 1, July 1 and
October 1 of each year, each institution shall transmit to the
Administrator the fees required by this subsection for the
immediately preceding quarter. The Administrator shall deposit
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
the money in the State Treasury for credit to the Account for
Student Indemnification.
2. The Administrator shall notify each postsecondary
educational institution licensed in this state if the balance in the
Account is [$250,000] $750,000 or more. If the balance in the
Account is [$250,000] $750,000 or more, a postsecondary
educational institution is not required to pay the fee required by
subsection 1. If the balance in the Account subsequently falls below
[$250,000,] $750,000, the Administrator shall notify each
postsecondary educational institution licensed in this state that the
fee must be paid until the balance in the Account is [$250,000]
$750,000 or more.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)